Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.350

Students with diabetes or epilepsy or other seizure disorders—Compliance with individual health plan—Immunity.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1709-S.SL) ***

A school district, school district employee, agent, or parent-designated adult who, acting in good faith and in substantial compliance with the student's individual health plan and the instructions of the student's licensed health care professional, provides assistance or services under RCW 28A.210.330 or 28A.210.355 shall not be liable in any criminal action or for civil damages in his or her individual or marital or governmental or corporate or other capacities as a result of the services provided under RCW 28A.210.330 to students with diabetes or under RCW 28A.210.355 to students with epilepsy or other seizure disorders.

[ 2021 c 29 s 3; 2002 c 350 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Effective date—2002 c 350: See notes following RCW 28A.210.330.